Colorado, session 2026A, SB070.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the
"Protecting Everyone from Excessive Police Surveillance (PEEPS) Act"
or "PEEPS Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration - legislative intent.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Technological advances and the growth of commercial data
systems have enabled the routine collection, aggregation, storage, and
sale of historical location information relating to individuals and vehicles,
including information derived from cameras, license plate readers,
cellular networks, and other technologies;
(b) Historical location information is highly sensitive in nature
and, when accessed over time, can reveal detailed and personal
information about an individual's movements, associations, habits, and
daily activities;
(c) Government access to historical location information through
privately or publicly maintained databases, rather than through direct
observation or narrowly targeted collection, presents unique risks of
overbroad surveillance and may occur outside traditional legal processes
and safeguards;
(d) The availability of commercial and third-party databases
-2- SB26-070

containing historical location information has created pathways for
government entities to obtain such information without a warrant, court
order, or clearly articulated statutory authority;
(e) Sharing of historical location information with third parties or
with government agencies outside a government entity's jurisdiction,
absent clear limits and accountability measures, increases the risk of
misuse, unauthorized secondary use, and erosion of public trust;
(f) Establishing clear statutory guardrails governing when and
how government entities may access, use, and share historical location
information promotes transparency, accountability, and consistent
application of privacy protections across jurisdictions; and
(g) The general assembly recognizes the essential role of
government entities, including law enforcement and emergency service
providers, in protecting public safety, and acknowledges that limited and
clearly defined exceptions are necessary to allow appropriate access to
historical location information in specific circumstances.
(2) It is the general assembly's intent to regulate government
access to databases containing historical location information; to restrict
the sharing of such information, except in narrow, well-defined
circumstances; to require oversight, record keeping, and compliance
policies when historical location information is collected; and to ensure
meaningful remedies and enforcement for violations of these protections.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 16-3-313 as
follows:
16-3-313. Prohibition on access to a historical location
information database - individual or vehicle - evidence inadmissible
in court - definitions.
-3- SB26-070

(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ACCESS" MEANS VIEWING, QUERYING, RETRIEVING, COPYING,
TRANSMITTING, ANALYZING, OR OTHERWISE USING A DATABASE AS
DEFINED IN THIS SECTION, WHETHER MANUALLY OR AUTOMATICALLY.
(b) "COLLECT" MEANS USING TECHNOLOGY TO RECORD
INFORMATION ABOUT AN INDIVIDUAL'S OR VEHICLE'S PHYSICAL LOCATIONS
OR MOVEMENTS.
(c) "DATABASE" MEANS A PHYSICAL OR DIGITAL INFORMATION
STORAGE SYSTEM, WHETHER PUBLICLY OR PRIVATELY OWNED, THAT
CONTAINS PHOTOS, VIDEOS, LICENSE PLATE DATA, FACIAL RECOGNITION
DATA, CELL SITE LOCATION DATA, OR ANY COMBINATION OF THESE.
(d) "GOVERNMENT ENTITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 16-3-303.5.
(e) "GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL" MEANS ANY OFFICER, EMPLOYEE,
AGENT, CONTRACTOR, OR REPRESENTATIVE OF A GOVERNMENT ENTITY.
(f) (I) "HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION" MEANS
INFORMATION THAT, WHEN ACCESSED, REVEALS THE LOCATIONS OF AN
INDIVIDUAL OR VEHICLE MORE THAN TWENTY-FOUR HOURS PRIOR TO THE
DATE OF THE ACCESS.
(II) "HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION" DOES NOT INCLUDE
VIDEO OR IMAGE RECORDINGS GENERATED BY CAMERAS IN
GOVERNMENT-OWNED BUILDINGS OR DASHBOARD CAMERAS AND
BODY-WORN CAMERAS OWNED AND OPERATED BY A GOVERNMENT ENTITY,
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE CAMERA TRANSMITS, STORES, OR BACKS UP
A RECORDING TO A LOCAL OR CENTRALIZED STORAGE SYSTEM, SO LONG
AS:
-4- SB26-070

(A) THE RECORDING IS NOT INDEXED, SEARCHABLE, OR ANALYZED
BY A UNIQUE IDENTIFIER, INCLUDING AN IDENTIFIER TIED TO A VEHICLE OR
INDIVIDUAL, SUCH AS A BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIER, BUT NOT INCLUDING AN
IDENTIFIER FOR THE INDIVIDUAL OR VEHICLE CARRYING THE CAMERA OR
AN IDENTIFIER CONNECTING THE RECORDING TO A PARTICULAR CASE OR
INCIDENT NUMBER, FOR THE PURPOSE OF TRACKING OR RECONSTRUCTING
AN INDIVIDUAL'S OR VEHICLE'S HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION; AND
(B) ACCESS TO THE RECORDING DOES NOT REVEAL AN
INDIVIDUAL'S OR VEHICLE'S HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION
THROUGH A DATABASE QUERY OR SIMILAR SEARCH PROCESS.
(g) "SUPERVISOR" MEANS A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL WHO
POSSESSES THE AUTHORITY TO DIRECT AND DISCIPLINE ONE OR MORE
GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS WITHIN A GOVERNMENT ENTITY.
(h) "WARRANT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN THIS ARTICLE 3.
"WARRANT" DOES NOT MEAN A SUBPOENA.
(2) A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL SHALL NOT ACCESS A DATABASE
THAT REVEALS HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION, EXCEPT:
(a) WHEN THE GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL HAS OBTAINED A VALID
JUDICIAL WARRANT ISSUED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 3 TO ACCESS THE
DATABASE;
(b) WHEN AN INDIVIDUAL GIVES EXPRESS CONSENT TO THEIR
SPECIFIC HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION BEING REVEALED TO A
SPECIFIC GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY, SO LONG AS THE CONSENT
DOES NOT ALLOW THE GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY TO ACCESS THE
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS NOT
CONSENTED;
(c) WHEN THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A VEHICLE REPORTS THE
-5- SB26-070

VEHICLE LOST OR STOLEN AND VOLUNTARILY CONSENTS TO THE VEHICLE'S
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION BEING SEARCHED;
(d) WHEN EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES MAKE OBTAINING A WARRANT
IMPRACTICAL BEFORE THE EXIGENCY EXPIRES; OR
(e) WHEN A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL IS CARRYING OUT ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING PURPOSES AND USES THE HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION
SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF:
(I) TOLL COLLECTION AND ENFORCEMENT, AUTHORIZED PURSUANT
TO SECTION 43-4-808;
(II) TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT, AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO SECTION
42-4-110.5;
(III) PARKING ENFORCEMENT; OR
(IV) INFORMATION SECURITY AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) (a) A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY THAT COLLECTS
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION SHALL NOT SHARE IT OUTSIDE THE
OFFICIAL'S OR ENTITY'S JURISDICTION, EXCEPT FOR A REASON SET FORTH
IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION OR PURSUANT TO A VALID COURT
ORDER.
(b) (I) A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY THAT COLLECTS
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION SHALL NOT SELL OR CONVEY IT TO
A PRIVATE, NONGOVERNMENTAL THIRD PARTY FOR ANY REASON,
WHETHER AS A MARKET TRANSACTION, A RESPONSE TO A PUBLIC RECORDS
REQUEST, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEPT TO THE LIMITED EXTENT NECESSARY
FOR A NONGOVERNMENTAL THIRD PARTY VENDOR, ACTING SOLELY AS A
SERVICE PROVIDER TO THE GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY, TO
TEMPORARILY ACCESS THE HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION FOR THE
-6- SB26-070

SOLE PURPOSE OF DIAGNOSING, REPAIRING, OR CONDUCTING
MAINTENANCE ON A TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION OR SOFTWARE DEFECT IN
THE SYSTEM USED TO COLLECT THE HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION.
(II) ACCESS BY A NONGOVERNMENTAL THIRD PARTY VENDOR TO
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION SHALL:
(A) BE LIMITED IN SCOPE AND DURATION TO THE MINIMUM EXTENT
NECESSARY TO RESOLVE THE IDENTIFIED MALFUNCTION OR DEFECT;
(B) PROHIBIT THE VENDOR FROM RETAINING, COPYING,
AGGREGATING, ANALYZING, OR USING THE HISTORICAL LOCATION
INFORMATION FOR ANY PURPOSE OTHER THAN RESOLVING THE
MALFUNCTION OR DEFECT;
(C) PROHIBIT THE VENDOR FROM DISCLOSING THE HISTORICAL
LOCATION INFORMATION TO ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY, UNLESS
THE INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY IS REQUIRED FOR ASSISTANCE IN RESOLVING
THE MALFUNCTION OR DEFECT; AND
(D) REQUIRE THE VENDOR TO DELETE OR OTHERWISE RELINQUISH
ACCESS TO THE HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION IMMEDIATELY UPON
RESOLUTION OF THE MALFUNCTION OR DEFECT.
(c) A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY THAT COLLECTS
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION SHALL ADOPT A POLICY FOR
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION THAT ENSURES:
(I) THE SECURITY AND ACCESS REGULATIONS OF THIS SECTION ARE
ADHERED TO;
(II) THAT HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION IS ENCRYPTED OR
OTHERWISE RENDERED UNREADABLE TO AN UNAUTHORIZED USER USING
METHODOLOGY OR TECHNOLOGY GENERALLY ACCEPTED IN THE FIELD OF
INFORMATION SECURITY;
-7- SB26-070

(III) THAT A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL DOES NOT ACCESS A
DATABASE CONTAINING HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION, ABSENT A
SHOWING TO A SUPERVISOR, AND, WITH WRITTEN APPROVAL FROM THE
SUPERVISOR, THAT THE ACCESS COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION;
(IV) A RECORD IS CREATED AND MAINTAINED EACH TIME
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION IS ACCESSED. THE RECORD MUST
INCLUDE:
(A) THE IDENTITY OF THE GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL AND ENTITY
SEEKING ACCESS;
(B) THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE FOR WHICH ACCESS WAS SOUGHT;
(C) THE APPLICABLE EXCEPTION AS LISTED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION AND THE SPECIFIC FACTUAL BASIS FOR THE SUPERVISOR
BELIEVING THE EXCEPTION WAS APPLICABLE;
(D) THE SUPERVISOR'S WRITTEN APPROVAL THAT GRANTED
ACCESS;
(E) THE FULL DESCRIPTION OF THE HISTORICAL LOCATION
INFORMATION ACCESSED; AND
(F) REDACTIONS FOR LICENSE PLATE NUMBERS, FACIAL IMAGES, OR
OTHER PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION;
(V) THAT THE RECORDS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(3)(c)(IV) OF THIS SECTION ARE AUDITED BY ONE OR MORE SUPERVISORS
AT LEAST EVERY NINETY DAYS TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SECTION. THE GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY SHALL CREATE A
WRITTEN STANDARDIZED POLICY OR PRACTICE FOR AN AUDIT THAT
REQUIRES, AT MINIMUM:
(A) VERIFICATION THAT ALL INFORMATION REQUIRED PURSUANT
-8- SB26-070

TO SUBSECTION (3)(c)(IV) OF THIS SECTION HAS BEEN PROVIDED;
(B) VERIFICATION THAT THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE FOR WHICH ACCESS
WAS SOUGHT COMPLIES WITH THIS SECTION;
(C) VERIFICATION THAT THE SCOPE OF THE HISTORICAL LOCATION
INFORMATION ACCESSED COMPLIES WITH THIS SECTION; AND
(D) THAT IN THE EVENT THE AUDITOR OR AUDITORS DETERMINE OR
HAVE REASON TO BELIEVE THAT A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY HAS
VIOLATED ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, FURTHER INVESTIGATION OF
THE ACTUAL OR SUSPECTED VIOLATION;
(VI) THE CREATION AND MAINTENANCE OF AN ANNUAL REPORT
THAT BOTH COMPILES AND SUMMARIZES THE RECORDS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (3)(c)(IV) OF THIS SECTION. THE REPORT MUST BE MADE
AVAILABLE BY JUNE 30 OF EACH YEAR TO THE PUBLIC. THE ANNUAL
REPORT MUST INCLUDE THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF TECHNOLOGY DEVICES
HELD BY A GOVERNMENT ENTITY THAT CAN COLLECT AN INDIVIDUAL'S OR
VEHICLE'S PHYSICAL LOCATION OR MOVEMENTS, AND THE LOCATION
WHERE THE DEVICES ARE DEPLOYED.
(VII) THAT ALL GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS WHOSE DUTIES INCLUDE
ACCESSING A DATABASE THAT CONTAINS HISTORICAL LOCATION
INFORMATION COMPLETE TRAINING ON HOW TO COMPLY WITH THIS
SECTION AND THE COMPLIANCE POLICY ADOPTED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION. THE TRAINING MUST NOT BE CREATED OR ADMINISTRATED BY A
PRIVATE ENTITY WHOSE BUSINESS INVOLVES COLLECTING HISTORICAL
LOCATION INFORMATION.
(d) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3)(d)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY THAT COLLECTS
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION SHALL NOT RETAIN THE
-9- SB26-070

INFORMATION FOR MORE THAN FOUR DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE
INFORMATION IS COLLECTED.
(II) HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION THAT WAS ACCESSED IN
COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION MAY ONLY BE
RETAINED FOR FIVE DAYS OR MORE IF:
(A) A VALID JUDICIAL WARRANT OR VALID COURT ORDER
EXPRESSLY AUTHORIZES THE GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY TO RETAIN
THE HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION FOR A PERIOD OF FIVE DAYS OR
LONGER; OR
(B) THE INFORMATION IS NECESSARY TO PRESERVE EVIDENCE IN
AN ACTIVE CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION OR OTHER LEGAL PROCEEDING AND
THE SUPERVISOR OF THE INVESTIGATION MAKES A WRITTEN
DETERMINATION, BASED ON SPECIFIC AND ARTICULABLE FACTS, THAT
RETAINING THE HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION FOR FIVE DAYS OR
MORE IS REQUIRED; OR
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL GIVES EXPRESS CONSENT TO THEIR SPECIFIC
HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION BEING REVEALED TO A SPECIFIC
GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY AND CONSENTS TO THEIR HISTORICAL
LOCATION INFORMATION BEING KEPT FOR FIVE DAYS OR MORE, SO LONG AS
THE CONSENT DOES NOT ALLOW THE GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR ENTITY TO
ACCESS THE HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
HAS NOT CONSENTED.
(III) UPON EXPIRATION OF THE APPLICABLE RETENTION PERIOD
DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(d), THE GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR
ENTITY SHALL PERMANENTLY DESTROY THE HISTORICAL LOCATION
INFORMATION AND ANY COPIES OF THE INFORMATION IN A MANNER THAT
RENDERS THE INFORMATION UNRECOVERABLE.
-10- SB26-070

(IV) THE COMPLIANCE POLICY REQUIRED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE PROCEDURES TO
ENSURE TIMELY DESTRUCTION OF THE HISTORICAL LOCATION
INFORMATION REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)(d) AND
VERIFICATION OF DESTRUCTION.
(4) (a) HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION ACCESSED IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS NOT ADMISSIBLE AS EVIDENCE IN ANY
CRIMINAL OR CIVIL PROCEEDING OR ANY OTHER JUDICIAL, QUASI-JUDICIAL,
OR ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING OR PROCEEDING.
(b) A GOVERNMENT ENTITY SHALL HAVE A WRITTEN, MANDATORY
DISCIPLINARY POLICY THAT INCLUDES PROVISIONS FOR SUSPENDING OR
REVOKING A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL'S ACCESS TO ANY DATABASE THAT
INCLUDES HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION WHEN THE GOVERNMENT
OFFICIAL VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION. A GOVERNMENT
ENTITY SHALL NOT DEVIATE FROM ITS WRITTEN DISCIPLINARY POLICY
AFTER A FINDING THAT A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL VIOLATED A PROVISION
OF THIS SECTION.
(5) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE SHALL NOT ADOPT A
LAW OR POLICY THAT ALLOWS GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS OR ENTITIES TO
ACCESS HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION IN A MANNER LESS
RESTRICTIVE THAN PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
(6) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, A SUBPOENA IS NOT A VALID
COURT ORDER.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-202, amend
(6)(b)(XVII) and (6)(b)(XVIII); and add (6)(b)(XIX) as follows:
24-72-202. Definitions.
As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:
-11- SB26-070

(6) (b) "Public records" does not include:
(XVII) A complaint of harassment or discrimination, as described
in section 22-1-143, that is unsubstantiated and all records related to the
unsubstantiated complaint, including records of an investigation into the
complaint; or
(XVIII) Jail assessments conducted pursuant to section 30-10-530
(5)(d) or 24-31-118; OR
(XIX) HISTORICAL LOCATION INFORMATION, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 16-3-313 (1).
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to violations on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-12- SB26-070